Hawaii statutes.
§351-69 Commission staff. (a)
Supervisory, administrative, and clerical personnel necessary for the efficient
functioning of the commission shall be appointed as provided in section 26-35
without regard to chapter 76, but subject to chapter 89, and provided that:

(1) No position filled as of June 19, 2007 by an
employee appointed pursuant to chapter 76 shall be affected by this [section];
and

(2) Upon becoming vacant, any position filled as of
June 19, 2007 by an employee appointed pursuant to chapter 76 shall be filled
by an employee appointed without regard to chapter 76.

(b) An executive director and an
administrative assistant shall be appointed, without regard to chapter 76, for
the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter. [L 1967, c 226, pt
of §1; HRS §351-69; am L 1998, c 240, §5; am L 2001, c 176, §1; am L
2007, c 199, §2]

Revision Note

"June 19, 2007" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next